Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1258
Investment of state funds; boards, commissions, departments, agencies, officials; powers and duties.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 72-1244 and 72-1267, each board, commission, department, agency, or official that previously was charged with the investment of state funds shall continue in all other respects as provided by law and shall continue to have all other powers and shall exercise all the functions and duties fixed or imposed upon it by law.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 22, p. 2356;

Laws 2003, LB 149, § 5.